Utah statutes.
9-4-1406.   Evaluations -- Reports.

(1)  The office shall periodically evaluate grantees of Community Services Block Grant funds as established by rule by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  Grantees of Community Services Block Grant funds shall submit to the office a year-end report, covering a reporting period consistent with the federal fiscal year, which provides an account of all programs operated with or supported by Community Services Block Grant funds, including:

(a)  types of programs operated by that grantee;

(b)  the program outcomes;

(c)  the number of persons served;

(d)  the number of times service was given; and

(e)  an accounting of all Community Services Block Grant funds expended by the grantee.

(3)  The office shall report annually to the appropriate legislative appropriations subcommittee on the distribution and expenditure of Community Services Block Grant funds.

